District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.32

Transition of licensed marriage and family therapists.

For a period of 2 years following March 10, 2004, all reference to a licensed marriage and family therapist shall be deemed to refer to a person meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether that person is licensed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 831.02, 33 DCR 729
as added Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-88, § 2(i), 50 DCR 10999